Washington statutes.
RCW 16.60.090

Failure to remove gate—Penalty.

Any person retaining a gate across the highway after his or her license shall expire, shall be subject to a fine of one dollar for the first day and fifty cents for each subsequent day he or she shall retain the same, and it may be removed by the road supervisor, as an obstruction, at the cost of the person placing or keeping it upon the highway.

[ 2011 c 336 s 432; Code 1881, Bagley's Supp., p 25 s 3; 1871 p 104 s 3; RRS s 5461.]